Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-151 of Title 47, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Law enforcement agency” means any county sheriff’s office,


municipal police department, campus police department, school


district police department, or other public entity in this state


that employs full-time peace officers certified by the Council on


Law Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET); and


2. “287(g) Program” means the program authorized under Section


287(g) of the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C., Section

Req. No. 2770 Page 1


1357(g), allowing the United States Immigration and Customs


Enforcement (ICE) to enter into agreements with state and local law


enforcement agencies to perform certain immigration enforcement


functions under federal supervision.


B. Every law enforcement agency in this state shall:


1. By September 1, 2026, apply for and enter into a memorandum


of agreement with the United States Immigration and Customs


Enforcement (ICE) to participate in the 287(g) Program upon approval


by ICE;


2. Maintain such agreement in good standing; and


3. Ensure that not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of its


certified peace officers, or a minimum of five officers, whichever


is greater, are nominated, trained, and cross-deputized under the


287(g) Program to perform authorized immigration enforcement


functions.


C. Law enforcement agencies shall make good-faith efforts to


comply with applicable federal requirements for participation in the


287(g) Program, including officer nomination, training, and


background investigations.


D. 1. Any law enforcement agency found to be in violation of


subsection B or C of this section shall be ineligible to receive


state-appropriated funds, including, but not limited to, grants from


the Justice Reinvestment Grant Program, CLEET revolving funds, or



Req. No. 2770 Page 2


other discretionary law enforcement assistance funds administered by


this state.


2. The Oklahoma Law Enforcement Accreditation Program (OLEAP)


or any accrediting body recognized by the state shall review the


agency’s accreditation status and may revoke or suspend


accreditation for willful noncompliance.


E. The Attorney General shall promulgate rules as necessary to


implement and enforce this section, including procedures for


reporting compliance and appeals.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2770 CN 1/15/2026 9:52:54 AM



















Req. No. 2770 Page 3